Washington statutes.
RCW 19.295.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Estate distribution document" means any one or more of the following documents, instruments, or writings prepared, or intended to be prepared, for a specific person or as marketing materials for distribution to any person, other than documents, instruments, writings, or marketing materials relating to a payable on death account established under *RCW 30.22.040(9) or a transfer on death account established under chapter 21.35 RCW:

(a) Last will and testament or any writing, however designated, that is intended to have the same legal effect as a last will and testament, and any codicil thereto;

(b) Revocable and irrevocable inter vivos trusts and any instrument which purports to transfer any of the trustor's current and/or future interest in real or personal property thereto;

(c) Agreement that fixes the terms and provisions of the sale of a decedent's interest in any real or personal property at or following the date of the decedent's death.

(2) "Financial institution" means a bank holding company registered under federal law, a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings bank, savings and loan association or credit union organized under state or federal law, or any affiliate, subsidiary, officer, or employee of a financial institution.

(3) "Gathering information for the preparation of an estate distribution document" means collecting data, facts, figures, records, and other particulars about a specific person or persons for the preparation of an estate distribution document, but does not include the collection of such information for clients in the customary and usual course of financial, tax, and associated planning by a certificate holder or licensee regulated under chapter 18.04 RCW.

(4) "Market" or "marketing" includes every offer, contract, or agreement to prepare or gather information for the preparation of, or to provide, individualized advice about an estate distribution document.

(5) "Person" means any natural person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, firm, or association.

[ 2009 c 113 s 2; 2008 c 161 s 1; 2007 c 67 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 30.22.040 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (9) to subsection (18). RCW 30.22.040 was recodified as RCW 30A.22.040 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

(2) The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).